Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.075

Taking motor vehicle without permission in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree if he or she, without the permission of the owner or person entitled to possession, intentionally takes or drives away any automobile or motor vehicle, whether propelled by steam, electricity, or internal combustion engine, that is the property of another, or he or she voluntarily rides in or upon the automobile or motor vehicle with knowledge of the fact that the automobile or motor vehicle was unlawfully taken.

(2) Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2003 c 53 s 73.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.